Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-110
Jails; equipment; appointment of physician; duties of county board; physician's report.

It shall be the duty of the county board at the expense of the respective counties to provide suitable means for warming the jail and its cells or apartments and provide frames and mattresses for beds and such other permanent fixtures and repairs as may be prescribed by the Jail Standards Board. The county board shall have power to appoint a physician to the jail when it deems it necessary and shall pay to such physician an annual or other salary as it may think reasonable and proper, which salary shall be drawn out of the county treasury. Such medical officer, or any physician or surgeon who is employed in the jail, shall make a report in writing whenever required by the county board, Jail Standards Board, or grand jury.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 10, p. 245;

Laws 1903, c. 55, § 1, p. 346;

R.S.1913, § 3538;

Laws 1919, c. 113, § 1, p. 276;

C.S.1922, § 3005;

C.S.1929, § 47-110;

R.S.1943, § 47-110;

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 35;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 10.

Authority of county board to purchase electric refrigerator to be installed in county jail was upheld. Beadle v. Harmon, 130 Neb. 389, 265 N.W. 18 (1936).